Arkansas, session 2025, SB125.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - OPERATIONS. There is hereby established
for the University of Central Arkansas for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the
following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item No. of Fiscal Year
No. Title Employees 2025-2026
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ADMINISTRATIVE POSITIONS
(1) President, Univ. of Central Arkansas 1 $354,537
(2) Executive Vice-President and Provost 1 $268,500
(3) Dean, College of Business 1 $263,509
(4) Dean, Coll. of Health/Behav. Sciences 1 $263,509
*HAR031*
01/27/2025 1:59:29 PM HAR031

SB125
(5) Dean, Coll. of Nat. Sci./Mathematics 1 $263,509
(6) Chief of Staff 1 $232,104
(7) Chief Information Officer 1 $231,055
(8) Executive Asst. to the President 1 $225,261
(9) Vice-Pres. for Enrollment Management 1 $225,261
(10) Vice-Pres. for Finance & Admin. 1 $225,261
(11) Vice-Pres. for Univ. & Gov. Relations 1 $221,840
(12) Vice-Pres. for Student Services 1 $221,840
(13) Vice-Pres. for Development 1 $221,840
(14) Academic Dean 8 $214,997
(15) Project/Program Administrator 107
Executive Project/Program Director $207,294
Exec. Project/Program Manager $181,097
Sr. Project/Program Director $167,382
Project/Program Director $135,750
Project/Program Manager $123,020
Executive Assistant $115,000
Project/Program Specialist $106,139
(16) Associate Provost 5 $202,554
(17) IT Pool 63
Network Engineer $200,973
Information Systems Manager $128,994
Computer Network Coordinator $128,780
Technical Support Staff $123,019
Coordinator, Academic Computing $121,571
Coord., Administrative Computing $121,570
Coordinator of Information Technology $119,967
Website Developer/Programmer $119,967
System Programmer/Web Developer $118,592
Computer Systems Mgr. $108,987
Database Administrator $106,607
Systems Administrator $105,547
Information Systems Security Specialist $103,579
Institution Information Technology Coord. $101,489
Assistant Database Administrator $97,665
Computer Support Manager $97,585
01/27/2025 1:59:29 PM HAR031

SB125
Information Systems Coordinator $97,585
Senior Software Support Specialist $97,585
Systems Specialist $97,585
Information Technology Manager $96,408
Network Support Specialist $93,831
Senior Software Support Analyst $93,831
Tech Support/Systems Admin. $92,374
Tech Support/Applications Support $92,374
Information Systems Business Manager $90,223
Security Analyst $90,223
Systems Analyst $90,223
Information Technology Specialist $88,339
Computer Support Coordinator $86,753
Software Support Analyst $86,753
Systems Applications Supervisor $86,753
Computer Operations Coordinator $83,416
Systems Coordination Analyst $83,416
PC Support Specialist $81,860
Computer Support Specialist $80,208
Database Analyst $80,208
Digital Broadcast Specialist $77,123
Network Support Analyst $77,123
Website Developer $77,123
Information Systems Analyst $74,157
Information Systems Security Analyst $74,157
Computer Support Analyst $74,157
Software Support Specialist $71,305
Telecommunications Supervisor $71,305
Media Specialist $69,975
Computer Support Technician $68,562
Help Desk Specialist $68,562
Computer Operator $65,925
Network Analyst $65,925
Telecommunications Specialist $65,925
Multimedia Specialist $62,208
Information Technology Assistant $58,608
01/27/2025 1:59:29 PM HAR031

SB125
Computer Lab Technician $56,353
Multimedia Technician $51,130
Audiovisual Laboratory Assistant $47,272
(18) Associate Vice-President 6 $194,960
(19) Director of Computer Services 3 $188,816
(20) General Counsel 1 $174,599
(21) Controller 1 $173,915
(22) Associate Dean 9 $172,300
(23) Director of Development 2 $170,510
(24) Assistant Vice-President 3 $165,137
(25) Director of Physical Plant 1 $163,702
(26) Director of University Relations 1 $163,388
(27) Assistant Provost 2 $163,388
(28) Registrar 1 $156,464
(29) Director of Counseling Center 1 $154,803
(30) Director of Planned Giving 1 $154,803
(31) Dir. of Corp. & Foundation Relations 1 $154,803
(32) Dir. of Grants & Other Sponsored Prgm. 1 $151,822
(33) Director of Engineering Systems 1 $147,876
(34) Continuing Education Coordinator 1 $146,665
(35) Dean of Students 1 $146,665
(36) Director of Public Service 1 $146,665
(37) Director of Corporate Relations 1 $144,923
(38) Assoc. Director of Computer Services 5 $144,564
(39) Assoc. Director of Development 2 $143,388
(40) Director of Institutional Research 1 $142,085
(41) Director of Student Aid 1 $141,348
(42) Director of Cooperative Education 1 $137,620
(43) Associate Controller 1 $132,372
(44) Business Manager 1 $131,802
(45) Dir. of Admissions 1 $131,622
(46) Director of Internal Audits 1 $129,266
(47) UCA Dir. of University Police 1 $128,295
(48) Project Engineer 1 $127,980
(49) Director of Major Gifts 1 $127,373
(50) Budget Officer 1 $126,225
01/27/2025 1:59:29 PM HAR031

SB125
(51) Development Officer 12 $122,527
(52) Director of Alumni 1 $113,661
(53) Dir. of Publications & Creative Svcs. 1 $113,108
(54) Director of Information 1 $109,420
(55) Director of Developmental Skills 1 $108,727
(56) Academic/Student Support 50
Student Development Specialist $106,608
Academic Counselor $94,342
(57) Assistant Dean of Students 14 $106,608
(58) Director of Disability Services 1 $106,608
(59) Dir. Environ. Health & Safety Prgms. 1 $106,311
(60) Senior Internal Auditor 1 $99,089
(61) Associate for Administration 3 $98,310
(62) Fiscal Support Pool 33
Fiscal Support Manager $92,082
Fiscal Support Supervisor $75,685
Accountant II $72,774
Accountant I $69,975
Fiscal Support Analyst $67,284
Fiscal Support Specialist $59,815
Accounting Technician $55,302
Fiscal Support Technician $51,130
(63) Public Safety Pool 35
HE Public Safety Commander III $90,223
Director Public Safety I $88,541
HE Public Safety Commander II $86,753
HE Public Safety Commander I $83,416
HE Public Safety Supervisor $74,157
Public Safety Officer $71,305
Public Safety Officer II $65,925
Security Officer Supervisor $62,208
Public Safety/Security Officer $56,353
HE Public Safety Dispatcher $47,272
Parking Control Supv. $47,272
Security Officer $47,272
Parking Control Officer $45,455
01/27/2025 1:59:29 PM HAR031

SB125
Watchman $38,855
(64) Buyer Supervisor 1 $78,713
(65) Campus Maintenance Supervisor 2 $78,713
(66) Education Counselor 13 $78,713
(67) Skilled Trades Pool 56
Skilled Trades Foreman $74,157
Skilled Trades Supervisor $71,305
Skilled Tradesman $68,562
Skilled Trades Helper $52,101
Apprentice Tradesman $46,319
(68) Editor 1 $72,774
(69) Human Resources Analyst 5 $72,774
(70) Maintenance Coordinator 4 $72,774
(71) Staff Development Coordinator 1 $72,774
(72) Building and Grounds Coordinator 2 $69,975
(73) Buyer 4 $69,975
(74) Construction Inspector 3 $69,975
(75) Construction/Maintenance Coordinator 2 $69,975
(76) Education & Instruction Specialist 1 $69,975
(77) Energy Conservation Coordinator 1 $69,975
(78) Engineer Technician 1 $69,975
(79) HEI Program Coordinator 33 $69,975
(80) Human Resources Recruiter 1 $69,975
(81) Print Shop Manager 1 $69,975
(82) Public Information Specialist 2 $69,975
(83) Student Applications Specialist 2 $69,975
(84) Administrative Support Pool 134
Administrative Assistant $67,284
Administrative Analyst $67,284
Administrative Support Supervisor $62,208
Administrative Specialist III $59,815
Administration Support Specialist $59,815
Administrative Specialist II $53,175
Administrative Support Specialist $53,175
Administrative Specialist I $47,272
Extra Help Assistant $38,855
01/27/2025 1:59:29 PM HAR031

SB125
(85) Asst. Registrar 9 $67,284
(86) Financial Aid Analyst 5 $67,284
(87) Library Support Pool 31
Library Supervisor $67,284
Library Specialist $57,515
Library Technician $53,175
Library Support Assistant $49,164
(88) Maintenance Supervisor 6 $67,284
(89) Payroll Services Specialist 2 $67,284
(90) Financial Aid Specialist 3 $62,208
(91) Human Resources Specialist 2 $62,208
(92) Inventory Control Manager 1 $62,208
(93) Landscape Supervisor 2 $62,208
(94) Student Recruitment Specialist 3 $62,208
(95) Instrumentation Technician 3 $59,815
(96) Maintenance Specialist 6 $59,815
(97) Research Assistant 1 $59,815
(98) Special Events Coordinator 3 $59,815
(99) Coordinator of Housekeeping 4 $57,515
(100) Laboratory Coordinator 2 $57,515
(101) Equipment Mechanic 1 $55,302
(102) Landscape Specialist 2 $55,302
(103) Warehouse Specialist 1 $55,302
(104) Duplication Assistant 1 $53,175
(105) Heavy Equipment Operator 5 $53,175
(106) Institutional Bus Driver 10 $53,175
(107) Cashier 2 $51,130
(108) Maintenance Assistant 12 $51,130
(109) Registrar's Assistant 4 $49,164
(110) Warehouse Worker 2 $47,272
(111) Equipment Operator 15 $45,455
(112) Institutional Services Supervisor 7 $43,706
(113) Institutional Services Assistant 54 $42,025
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ACADEMIC POSITIONS
(114) Faculty 59
01/27/2025 1:59:29 PM HAR031

SB125
Distinguished Professor $229,010
Professor $197,881
Assoc. Professor $184,186
Asst. Professor $156,658
Instructor $128,780
Lecturer $107,878
(115) Department Chairperson 40 $201,304
(116) Director of Library 1 $191,606
(117) Research Associate 2 $146,533
(118) Archivist 1 $127,916
(119) Assoc. Librarian 2 $112,217
(120) Asst. Librarian 11 $106,436
(121) Research Assistant 2 $87,721
NINE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ACADEMIC POSITIONS
(122) Faculty 615
Distinguished Professor $221,655
Professor $194,459
Assoc. Professor $170,492
Asst. Professor $142,719
Instructor $111,361
Senior Lecturer $103,138
Lecturer II $96,692
Lecturer I $89,980
(123) Part-Time Faculty 200 $56,046
(124) Graduate Assistant 270 $35,147
TWELVE MONTH AUXILIARY ENTERPRISES
POSITIONS
(125) Head Football Coach 1 $262,279
(126) Senior Physician 1 $248,403
(127) Head Coach/Athletic Director 1 $221,774
(128) Project/Program Administrator 26
Executive Project/Program Director $207,294
Exec. Project/Program Manager $181,097
Sr. Project/Program Director $167,382
Project/Program Director $135,750
01/27/2025 1:59:29 PM HAR031

SB125
Project/Program Manager $123,020
Executive Assistant $115,000
Project/Program Specialist $106,139
(129) Head Basketball Coach 2 $206,846
(130) IT Pool 3
Network Engineer $200,973
Information Systems Manager $128,994
Computer Network Coordinator $128,780
Technical Support Staff $123,019
Coordinator, Academic Computing $121,571
Coord., Administrative Computing $121,570
Coordinator of Information Technology $119,967
Website Developer/Programmer $119,967
System Programmer/Web Developer $118,592
Computer Systems Mgr. $108,987
Database Administrator $106,607
Systems Administrator $105,547
Information Systems Security Specialist $103,579
Institution Information Technology Coord. $101,489
Assistant Database Administrator $97,665
Computer Support Manager $97,585
Information Systems Coordinator $97,585
Senior Software Support Specialist $97,585
Systems Specialist $97,585
Information Technology Manager $96,408
Network Support Specialist $93,831
Senior Software Support Analyst $93,831
Tech Support/Systems Admin. $92,374
Tech Support/Applications Support $92,374
Information Systems Business Manager $90,223
Security Analyst $90,223
Systems Analyst $90,223
Information Technology Specialist $88,339
Computer Support Coordinator $86,753
Software Support Analyst $86,753
Systems Applications Supervisor $86,753
01/27/2025 1:59:29 PM HAR031

SB125
Computer Operations Coordinator $83,416
Systems Coordination Analyst $83,416
PC Support Specialist $81,860
Computer Support Specialist $80,208
Database Analyst $80,208
Digital Broadcast Specialist $77,123
Network Support Analyst $77,123
Website Developer $77,123
Information Systems Analyst $74,157
Information Systems Security Analyst $74,157
Computer Support Analyst $74,157
Software Support Specialist $71,305
Telecommunications Supervisor $71,305
Media Specialist $69,975
Computer Support Technician $68,562
Help Desk Specialist $68,562
Computer Operator $65,925
Network Analyst $65,925
Telecommunications Specialist $65,925
Multimedia Specialist $62,208
Information Technology Assistant $58,608
Computer Lab Technician $56,353
Multimedia Technician $51,130
Audiovisual Laboratory Assistant $47,272
(131) Associate Vice-President 1 $191,324
(132) Physician 1 $164,492
(133) Assoc. Dir. of Athletics 2 $154,710
(134) Head Coach 12 $146,048
(135) Dir. of Auxiliary Enterprises 1 $140,296
(136) Advanced Practice Nurse 3 $127,234
(137) Compliance Coordinator 1 $120,641
(138) Director of Housing 1 $115,923
(139) Assistant Athletic Director 5 $114,807
(140) Assistant Coach 36 $114,807
(141) Athletic Trainer 1 $114,807
(142) Asst. Strength/Conditioning Coach 1 $114,807
01/27/2025 1:59:29 PM HAR031

SB125
(143) Assistant Dean of Students 3 $106,608
(144) Coordinator of Intramural Activities 2 $103,400
(145) Coordinator of Athletic Facilities 1 $96,579
(146) Fiscal Support Pool 8
Fiscal Support Manager $92,082
Fiscal Support Supervisor $75,685
Accountant II $72,774
Accountant I $69,975
Fiscal Support Analyst $67,284
Fiscal Support Specialist $59,815
Accounting Technician $55,302
Fiscal Support Technician $51,130
(147) Campus Maintenance Supervisor 1 $78,713
(148) Skilled Trades Pool 21
Skilled Trades Foreman $74,157
Skilled Trades Supervisor $71,305
Skilled Tradesman $68,562
Skilled Trades Helper $52,101
Apprentice Tradesman $46,319
(149) UCA Asst. Director of Housing 2 $72,774
(150) Education and Instruction Specialist 1 $69,975
(151) HEI Program Coordinator 8 $69,975
(152) Campus Equip. & Facilities Specialist 3 $67,325
(153) Administrative Support Pool 6
Administrative Assistant $67,284
Administrative Analyst $67,284
Administrative Support Supervisor $62,208
Administrative Specialist III $59,815
Administration Support Specialist $59,815
Administrative Specialist II $53,175
Administrative Support Specialist $53,175
Administrative Specialist I $47,272
Extra Help Assistant $38,855
(154) Medical Technologist 2 $67,284
(155) Food Service Pool 7
Food Preparation Manager $64,696
01/27/2025 1:59:29 PM HAR031

SB125
Food Preparation Supervisor $57,515
Food Preparation Coordinator $51,130
Food Preparation Specialist $43,706
Food Preparation Technician $40,409
(156) Inventory Control Manager 1 $62,208
(157) Licensed Practical Nurse 6 $62,208
(158) Special Events Coordinator 1 $59,815
(159) Coordinator of Housekeeping 1 $57,515
(160) Facility Manager I 1 $57,515
(161) Campus Postmaster 1 $55,302
(162) Health Services Specialist II 1 $55,302
(163) Institutional Bus Driver 1 $53,175
(164) Maintenance Assistant 1 $51,130
(165) Institutional Services Shift Supv. 1 $49,164
(166) Mail Services Coordinator 1 $49,164
(167) Residential Care Assistant 5 $47,272
(168) Mail Services Assistant 1 $45,455
(169) Institutional Services Supervisor 4 $43,706
(170) Institutional Services Assistant 29 $42,025
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 2,298

SECTION 2. EXTRA HELP - OPERATIONS. There is hereby authorized, for
the University of Central Arkansas for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the
following maximum number of part-time or temporary employees, to be known as
"Extra Help", payable from funds appropriated herein for such purposes: one
thousand six hundred (1,600) temporary or part-time employees, when needed,
at rates of pay not to exceed those provided in the Uniform Classification
and Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act for the appropriate
classification.

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - STATE OPERATIONS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the University of Central Arkansas, to be payable from the
University of Central Arkansas Fund, for personal services and operating
expenses of the University of Central Arkansas for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, the following:

01/27/2025 1:59:29 PM HAR031

SB125
ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $60,350,000
(02) EXTRA HELP 2,044,575
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 20,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(04) CONTINGENCY 3,120,729
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $65,535,304

SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - CASH FUNDS. There is hereby appropriated,
to the University of Central Arkansas, to be payable from cash funds as
defined by Arkansas Code 19-4-801, for personal services and operating
expenses of the University of Central Arkansas for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $34,746,488
(02) EXTRA HELP 4,000,000
(03) OVERTIME 169,000
(04) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 32,000,000
(05) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 50,057,826
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 1,678,916
(C) PROF. FEES 5,703,475
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 2,000,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(06) CAPITAL IMPROVEMENTS 38,600,000
(07) DEBT SERVICE 16,500,000
(08) PROMOTIONAL ITEMS 600,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $186,055,705

01/27/2025 1:59:29 PM HAR031

SB125
SECTION 5. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, the Higher Education Expenditure Restriction
Act, or their successors, and other fiscal control laws of this State, where
applicable, and regulations promulgated by the Department of Finance and
Administration, as authorized by law, shall be strictly complied with in
disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 6. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 7. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the General
Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the
appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.





01/27/2025 1:59:29 PM HAR031